Utah statutes.
63J-4a-304.   Interference with an investigation or audit prohibited.

No person may:

(1)  interfere with or impede an investigation or audit of the office or fraud unit; or

(2)  interfere with the office relative to the content of a report, the conclusions reached in a report, or the manner of disclosing the results and findings of the office.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

